Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 4. Fees.

Collateral references. —

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, §§ 344-346.

Sec. 28.15.271.
Fees.

The fees for drivers’ licenses and permits, including renewals, and all related driver skills tests are as follows:

all noncommercial vehicles and motor-driven cycles

each license fee . . . . . $20;

each driver skills test . . . . . $15;

all commercial motor vehicles

each license fee . . . . . $100;

each driver skills test . . . . . $25;

instruction permit . . . . . $15;

duplicate of driver’s license or instruction permit . . . . . $15;

temporary license and renewal of permit . . . . . $5;

school bus driver’s endorsement renewal . . . . . $5.

In addition to the fees under (a) of this section,

a person who renews a driver’s license by mail shall pay a fee of $1;

a person who applies for a limited driver’s license under AS

28.15.201

shall pay a fee of $100;

a person who applies for reinstatement of a driver’s license under AS

28.15.211

shall pay a fee of

$100 if the person’s driver’s license has, within the 10 years preceding the application, been suspended, revoked, or limited under the provisions of this chapter, except as provided by (C) of this paragraph, only once;

$250 if the person’s driver’s license has, within the 10 years preceding the application, been suspended, revoked, or limited under the provisions of this chapter, except as provided by (D) of this paragraph, two or more times;

$200 if the person’s driver’s license has, within the 10 years preceding the application, been revoked under AS

28.35.030

or

28.35.032

only once; or

$500 if the person’s driver’s license has, within the 10 years preceding the application, been revoked under AS

28.35.030

or

28.35.032

two or more times; and

a person who applies for a driver’s license that is federally compliant shall pay a fee of $20.

The fee for a driver skills test must be paid at the time an appointment for the skills test is made or before the skills test is given, whichever is earlier. The department may not refund a driver skills test fee if the applicant cancels the appointment, fails to appear at the appointed day and time, or fails to pass the skills test.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

The department shall charge $50 for issuance of a new license to replace a license cancelled under AS

28.15.161(a)(5)

because the person is restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages under AS

04.16.160

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 16 ch 60 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 32 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 2 ch 53 SLA 1990; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 4 ch 50 SLA 1993; am § 6 ch 59 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 71 SLA 1994; am § 17 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 2002; am § 30 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 25 ch 22 SLA 2015; am § 15 ch 8 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, deleted “but not limited to” after “including” in the introductory language in (a).

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (b)(4), and made related changes.

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent related to the amendment of this section by
ch. 71, SLA 1994 (CSHB 299(FIN) am S), see 1994 House Journal 2961.